Utah statutes.
59-12-1702.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Annexation" means an annexation to a county under Title 17, Chapter 2,
Annexation to County.
(2)  "Annexing area" means an area that is annexed into a county.
(3)  "Council of governments" is as defined in Subsection 72-2-117.5(1)(a).
(4)  "Fixed guideway" means a public transit facility that uses and occupies:
(a)  rail for the use of public transit; or
(b)  a separate right-of-way for the use of public transit.
(5)  "Metropolitan planning organization" is as defined in Section 72-1-208.5.
(6)  "Regionally significant transportation facility" means:
(a)  in a county of the first or second class:
(i)  a principal arterial highway as defined in Subsection 72-4-102.5(1)(g);
(ii)  a minor arterial highway as defined in Subsection 72-4-102.5(1)(f);
(iii)  a fixed guideway that:
(A)  extends across two or more cities or unincorporated areas; or
(B)  is an extension to an existing fixed guideway; or
(iv)  an airport of regional significance, as defined by the Transportation
Commission; or
(b)  in a county of the third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class:
(i)  a principal arterial highway as defined in Section 72-4-102.5;
(ii)  a minor arterial highway as defined in Section 72-4-102.5;
(iii)  a major collector highway as defined in Section 72-4-102.5;
(iv)  a minor collector road as defined in Section 72-4-102.5; or
(v)  an airport of regional significance, as defined by the Transportation
Commission.
